Washington statutes.
RCW 43.158.100

Clean energy coordinated permitting process—Department of ecology—Duties.

An optional, fully coordinated permit process is established for clean energy projects that do not apply to the energy facility site evaluation council under chapter 80.50 RCW. In support of the coordinated permitting process for clean energy projects, the department of ecology must:

(1) Act as the central point of contact for the project proponent for the coordinated permitting process for projects that do not apply to the energy facility site evaluation council under chapter 80.50 RCW and communicate with the project proponent about defined issues;

(2) Conduct an initial assessment of the proposed project review and permitting actions for coordination purposes as provided in RCW 43.158.110;

(3) Ensure that the project proponent has been informed of all the information needed to apply for the state and local permits that are included in the coordinated permitting process;

(4) Facilitate communication between project proponents and agency staff to promote timely permit decisions and promote adherence to agreed schedules;

(5) Verify completion among participating agencies of administrative review and permit procedures, such as providing public notice;

(6) Assist in resolving any conflict or inconsistency among permit requirements and conditions;

(7) Consult with potentially affected federally recognized Indian tribes as provided in RCW 43.158.150 in support of the coordinated permitting process;

(8) Engage with potentially affected overburdened communities as provided in RCW 43.158.150;

(9) Manage a fully coordinated permitting process; and

(10) Coordinate with local jurisdictions to assist with fulfilling the requirements of chapter 36.70B RCW and other local permitting processes.

[ 2023 c 230 s 204.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2023 c 230: See note following RCW 43.394.010.